Massachusetts, session 194th, S66.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 14 of chapter 61A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the figure “120”, each time it appears, and
inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- “180”; and,
Said section is hereby further amended by striking out the figure “90”, the first and
second time it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following figure:-
“120”.
of 2

SECTION 2. The sixteenth paragraph of said section 14 of said chapter 61A, as so
appearing, is hereby further amended by adding the following sentence:- “The landowner shall
respond no later than 30 days after having received the purchase and sale contract.”
SECTION 3. The twenty-third paragraph of said section 14 of said chapter 61, as so
appearing, is hereby further amended by adding the following sentence:- “The city or town shall
not be required to exercise the option to purchase any property not classified under this chapter.”
SECTION 4. Section 9 of chapter 61B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out the figure “120”, each time it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in
each instance, the following figure:- “180”; and,
Said section is hereby further amended by striking out the figure “90”, the first and
second time it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following figure:-
“120”.
SECTION 5. The sixteenth paragraph of said section 9 of said chapter 61B, as so
appearing, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- “The landowner shall respond
no later than 30 days after having received the purchase and sale contract.”
SECTION 6. The twenty-fourth paragraph of said section 9 of said chapter 61B, as so
appearing, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- “The city or town shall not be
required to exercise the option to purchase any property not classified under this chapter.”
SECTION 7. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2